Kentucky statutes. TITLE VII Public Property and Public Printing
Interest Rates on Public Bonds

58.410.
Definitions for KRS 58.410 to 58.440.

As used in KRS

58.410

to

58.440

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Public body” means the Commonwealth, its political subdivisions, its municipalities, its school and other taxing districts, its nontaxing public bodies and institutions, and any and all agencies and instrumentalities thereof, whether such agencies or instrumentalities be now existing or hereafter created and established under and pursuant to specific statutory authority, or whether such agencies or instrumentalities be now existing or hereafter organized, established, and caused to exist as nonprofit corporations under applicable general laws, having performance as such agencies or instrumentalities as their sole corporate purposes;

“Public obligation” means bonds, notes, warrants, or other obligations of any public body;

“Rate of interest” means both the coupon or stated interest rate applicable to any public obligation, and the effective interest rate or interest cost percentage, computed upon the basis of the coupon or stated interest rate or rates and the price actually to be received by the issuing public body; provided, however, KRS

58.410

to

58.440

is not intended, and shall not be construed, to amend, alter, or repeal any existing law requiring that certain public obligations be sold at not less than the face amount thereof.

KRS

58.410

to

58.440

does not relate to or affect borrowing by any person or corporation except such as are within the definition of “public body” as set forth in this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 24, §
1; repealed and reenact., Acts 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 291, effective July 13, 1990.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A county or group of counties operating under an interlocal agreement and issuing revenue bonds which are “public obligations” under subsection (1)(b) to this section would be subject to the interest rate provisions of KRS

58.430

which repealed the provisions of subsection (3) of KRS

65.270

upon its enactment.

OAG 81-346

.

58.420.
Public policy as to bond interest rates.

It is hereby determined and declared to be the public policy of the Commonwealth that interest rates payable by public bodies upon public obligations be such as to be competitive with those rates which are permitted by other states, in order that necessary public projects may be financed and may be undertaken in the interest of the public health, safety, and general welfare.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 24, §
2; repealed and reenact., Acts 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 292, effective July 13, 1990.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Chapters 103 and 58 separately, and when considered in pari materia, provide for variable interest rate bonds.

OAG 85-103

.

58.430.
Removal of interest rate limits.

From and after March 9, 1970, notwithstanding any other acts or laws of other import which may presently prevail, wherever the same may be found in the Kentucky Revised Statutes as of such date, it shall be lawful for public bodies to establish, agree, and bind themselves to pay interest upon their public obligations at any rate or rates which may be determined upon by the governing bodies of the respective public bodies which are the issuers thereof; but subject, nevertheless, to such approvals as may now or hereafter be applicable thereto according to law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 24, §
3; repealed and reenact., Acts 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 293, effective July 13, 1990.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section, by its express language, repealed the interest ceiling provisions of KRS

178.170

.

OAG 71-493

.

This section does not implicitly repeal or in any way modify the maximum interest rate a school district may pay on money borrowed in anticipation of taxes.

OAG 80-571

.

A county or group of counties operating under an interlocal agreement and issuing revenue bonds which are “public obligations” under subsection (1)(b) of KRS

58.410

would be subject to the interest rate provisions of this section which repealed the provisions of subsection (3) of KRS

65.270

upon its enactment.

OAG 81-346

.

Since KRS

96A.120

(3) provides that a mass transit authority may use the procedures set forth in KRS

58.010

to

58.170

, subject to any interest rate limitations which may be applicable thereto as provided by law, and since, as between KRS

58.170

and

96A.120

, the specific governs over the general, anticipatory notes issued by transit authority fall within the provisions of this section and are not subject to the interest limitations of KRS 58.170.

OAG 83-152

.

KRS

103.200

and

103.220

in no explicit language establish pollution projects as the sole category of projects subject to a variable rate of interest and the pertinent statutes amended by Acts 1984, Ch. 122 in no way prohibit the application of the variable rate to projects other than pollution control projects; they merely emphasize pollution control projects, but not to the detriment of other kinds of projects falling within the broad range of KRS

103.200

to

103.285

. Moreover, this section is a specific statute dealing only with interest rates on public bonds and is so flexibly worded as to support variable rate structures in the issuance of public bonds and even if the sections in KRS Ch. 103 amended by Acts 1984, Ch. 122 (KRS 103.200,

103.210

,

103.2101

,

103.220

—

103.240

,

103.280

) were to be said to be in some conflict with the provisions of this section, the specific statute, this section, should control over the provisions of KRS Ch. 103.

OAG 84-257

.

By its express language, this section repealed the maximum rate found in KRS

220.390

,

220.400

and KRS

220.370

; the purpose of this section was to permit public bodies to meet prevailing interest rate competition.

OAG 84-360

.

Under KRS

103.200

(2), variable rate bonds do not apply only to pollution control facilities bonds; thus, the Kentucky Development Finance Authority may lawfully issue variable rate bonds with Put and Remarketing features in a proposed Internal Revenue Bond issue for the financing of the construction and equipping of airport facilities, under KRS

103.200

to

103.285

, as amended by Chapter 122, 1984, Session, and this section.

OAG 84-377

.

This section, as a specific statute on public bond interest rates, clearly authorizes the insurers of the bonds to bind themselves to pay interest at “any rate or rates which may be determined by the governing body” issuing the bonds; the term “at any rate or rates,” as used in this section, is sufficiently broad to encompass variable rates arrived at under agreement.

OAG 85-103

.

Chapters 103 and 58 separately, and when considered in pari materia, provide for variable interest rate bonds.

OAG 85-103

.

58.440.
Refinancing at higher rate than that of original issue.

If any public body shall determine:

That financing of a public project may be accomplished to the best advantage in the public interest only by combining the same with refinancing of previously issued and outstanding public obligations at a rate or rates of interest higher than the rate or rates otherwise applicable thereto;

That refinancing of a public project at a higher interest rate or rates is necessary in order to prevent or anticipate default in payment of interest or principal of public obligations with regard thereto; or

That any combination of the circumstances described in subsection (1) or (2) of this section exists;

then such refinancing is recognized to be lawful; provided, however, that prior to any such refinancing at a higher rate or rates of interest, the issuing public body shall make and spread at large upon its public records its determination that such action is necessary or desirable in the public interest, and its reasons therefor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 24, §
4; repealed and reenact., Acts 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 294, effective July 13, 1990.